Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2727.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; Arizona health innovation trust fund; state treasurer; pilot program; report; exemption; intent; definition A. The sum of $1,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona health innovation trust fund established by section 41-177, Arizona Revised Statutes. B. The sum of $1,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona health innovation trust fund established by section 41-177, Arizona Revised Statutes, for the state treasurer to allocate to an entity that meets the requirements of section 41-177, subsection E, Arizona Revised Statutes, to conduct a pilot program focused on health innovations for persons living with chronic conditions.  The entity shall submit a report pursuant to section 41-177, subsection F, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to the pilot program. C. The appropriation made in subsection B of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations. D. The legislature intends that the Arizona health innovation trust fund that consists of monies appropriated by the legislature, earnings from the fund and gifts or grants donated or given to the fund as prescribed by section 41-177, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, steadily grow to ultimately maintain a permanent endowment balance of at least $200,000,000. E. For the purposes of this section, "chronic condition": 1. Means a long-lasting health condition, typically lasting at least one year, that requires ongoing medical attention and often limits daily activities. 2. Includes autoimmune diseases, cardiovascular diseases, cancers, diabetes and neurodegenerative diseases.